Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF467.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 244.18, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. (a) For purposes of this section, the terms defined in this subdivision have the meanings given them. (b) "Correctional fees"deleted text begin :deleted text end deleted text begin (1) effective August 1, 2027, means fees charged or contracted for by a probation agency or the commissioner of corrections for court-ordered or community-provided correctional services, including but not limited to drug testing, electronic home monitoring, treatment, and programming; and deleted text end deleted text begin (2) effective August 1, 2023, through July 31, 2027,deleted text end include fees for the following correctional services: deleted text begin (i)deleted text end new text begin (1)new text end community service work placement and supervision; deleted text begin (ii)deleted text end new text begin (2)new text end restitution collection; deleted text begin (iii)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end supervision; deleted text begin (iv)deleted text end new text begin (4)new text end court-ordered investigations; deleted text begin (v)deleted text end new text begin (5)new text end any other court-ordered service; deleted text begin (vi)deleted text end new text begin (6)new text end postprison supervision or other form of release; and deleted text begin (vii)deleted text end new text begin (7)new text end supervision or other probation-related services provided by a probation agency or by the Department of Corrections for individuals supervised by the commissioner of corrections. (c) "Probation" has the meaning given in section 609.02, subdivision 15. (d) "Probation agency" means a probation agency, including a Tribal Nation, organized under section 244.19 or chapter 401. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 244.18, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Annual report. deleted text begin (a)deleted text end By January 15 each year, the commissioner must submit an annual report on implementing the commissioner's duties under this section to the chairs and ranking minority members of the senate and house of representatives committees and divisions with jurisdiction over criminal justice funding and policy. At a minimum, the report must include information on the types of correctional services for which fees were imposed, the aggregate amount of fees imposed, and the amount of fees collected. deleted text begin (b) This subdivision expires August 1, 2027. deleted text end Sec. 3. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 244.18, subdivision 9, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 25-03315 244.18 CORRECTIONAL FEES; SCHEDULE, COLLECTION, AND USE. Subd. 9. Sunsetting supervision fees; sunset plan. (a) By August 1, 2025, each probation agency must provide to the commissioner a written plan for phasing out supervision fees for individuals under the agency's supervision and control, and the commissioner must review and approve the plan by August 1, 2027. By August 1, 2027, the commissioner must develop a written plan for phasing out supervision fees for individuals under the commissioner's supervision and control. (b) A copy of an approved plan must be provided to all individuals under the supervision and control of the agency or the commissioner and in a language and manner that each individual can understand. (c) Supervision fees must not be increased from August 1, 2023, through July 31, 2027. (d) This subdivision expires August 1, 2027.